Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 237D.1 Foster parent addresses ââ confidentiality. 1. For purposes of this chapter: a. âAddressâ means the residential address of a person. b. âChild foster careâ means the same as defined in section 237.1. c. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human services. d. âFoster childâ means a child receiving child foster care. e. âFoster parentâ means an individual licensee as defined in section 237.1. 2. a. The department and the departmentâs agents shall not knowingly provide or make available a document to a biological parent of a foster child if the document contains the unredacted address of the foster parent who is currently providing child foster care to the foster child. b. The department and the departmentâs agents shall not verbally disclose the address of the foster parent who is currently providing child foster care to a foster child to a biological parent of the foster child. 3. Notwithstanding subsection 2, a document may contain a foster parentâs unredacted address, and the department and the House File 2526, p. 2 departmentâs agents may verbally disclose a foster parentâs address, if the foster parent provides written consent to disclose the address to a foster childâs biological parent prior to the department or the departmentâs agent providing the document, making the document available, or verbally disclosing the address to the biological parent. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2526, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor